Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 05.25.050.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state to promote safety for persons and property in and connected with the use, operation, and equipment of boats on water of the state and to promote uniformity of laws relating to boat safety.

History.

(§ 1 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 10 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 11 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “It is the policy of this state to promote safety for persons and property in and connected with the use, operation, and equipment of vessels in recreational pursuits in inland water and to promote uniformity of laws relating thereto.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Sec. 05.25.052.
Uniform state waterway marking system.

The department shall develop and adopt regulations establishing a uniform state waterway marking system for the placement of regulatory markers. The regulations must be compatible with the system of aids to navigation prescribed by the United States Coast Guard.

History.

(§ 12 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under secs. 27 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, § 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section is repealed.

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Administrative Code. —

For uniform state waterway marking system, see 11 AAC 7, art. 1.

Sec. 05.25.053.
Boating safety program.

Except as provided in this section, the department shall administer a statewide boating safety program. The program must, to the extent consistent with state law,

secure the full benefits available to the state under 46 U.S.C. 13101 — 13110; and

take additional actions necessary to gain initial and ongoing federal acceptance of the boating safety program and to qualify and apply for federal money under 46 U.S.C. 13102.

The department shall cooperate with local, state, and federal agencies, private and public organizations, and individuals to provide for

a statewide boating safety education program; the program must

develop educational materials relevant to the unique needs of urban and rural boaters in this state;

support statewide boating safety training programs;

support boating safety education and training programs for children and other high risk groups;

train, certify, and support boating safety instructors;

evaluate, on an ongoing basis, the effectiveness of programs funded under this chapter;

a boating safety advisory council as described in AS

05.25.057

;

a uniform state waterway marking system; and

a boat registration and numbering system through the Department of Administration.

The Department of Public Safety shall cooperate with local, state, and federal agencies, private and public organizations, and individuals to provide for

a boating collisions, accidents, and casualties reporting system; and

boating safety patrol and law enforcement activity.

History.

(§ 12 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under secs. 27 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section is repealed.

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Sec. 05.25.055.
Registration and numbering of boats.

A boat placed on water of the state must be titled, registered, and numbered as required by this chapter. The Department of Administration shall adopt by regulation a boat registration and numbering system that is consistent with the national standard for state numbering systems established by the United States Coast Guard.

In adopting a boat registration system under (a) of this section, the Department of Administration shall authorize agents, including boat dealers, to register boats.

A boat dealer shall require a purchaser of a new or used boat sold at retail to complete a registration application and pay the registration fee before the boat leaves the dealer’s premises unless the boat is exempt from registration and numbering under this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter.

A person may not operate a boat on water of the state unless a valid certificate of number has been awarded by the Department of Administration to the boat and the identification number and any required validation decals are properly displayed on the boat.

The Department of Administration shall authorize agents to accept an application and registration fee for registration, to issue a registration, and to forward the application and registration fee to the Department of Administration.

Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, the owner of a boat for which a current certificate of number has been awarded under federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state shall apply for a certificate of number in this state as required by this chapter if the boat is operated on water of the state for more than 90 consecutive days or if the boat is a barge and is operated on water of the state for more than 60 consecutive days. If a boat has an existing number, the owner may request that the department issue the same number for purposes of this section, and the department shall comply with the request unless compliance would result in a duplication of numbers.

A certificate of number issued under this chapter is valid for three years unless terminated or discontinued earlier as required by this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter. The certificate expires on the last day of the month at the end of the three-year period. The expiration date shall be indicated on the certificate.

All records of ownership of boats that are kept by the Department of Administration under this section are public records. The Department of Administration shall provide records of ownership and registration expense reports to the Department of Public Safety for the purposes of meeting the federal requirements for state programs and implementing this chapter.

The following boats are exempt from the numbering and registration provisions of this section:

a boat that

is not a barge;

is operated in this state for a period not exceeding 90 consecutive days; and

has a current, valid certificate of number issued by another state having a federally approved numbering system;

a foreign boat operated in water of the state for a period not exceeding 90 consecutive days;

a boat owned by the United States or an entity or political subdivision of the United States, or a boat owned by a state or an entity or political subdivision of a state;

a boat that is not equipped with mechanical propulsion;

a boat with a valid document to operate the boat that is issued by a foreign government;

a handmade nonmotorized umiaq with a walrus or sealskin covering;

a boat that

is a barge;

is operated in this state for a period not exceeding 60 consecutive days; and

has a current, valid certificate of number issued by another state having a federally approved numbering system.

History.

(§ 12 ch 28 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 34 SLA 2004; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For boat registration, see 2 AAC 70.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “A boat” for “An undocumented boat” at the beginning of the first sentence, inserted “titled,” preceding “registered” and made a stylistic change; in (f), deleted “or unless the owner has been awarded a current, valid Alaska certificate of number from the United States Coast Guard,” following “this chapter,”, inserted “or if the boat is a barge and is operated on water of the state for more than 60 consecutive days” following “90 consecutive days”; in (i), added (i)(1)(A), and made related and stylistic changes, in (i)(5), deleted “the United States or” preceding “a foreign government”, added (i)(7), and made a related change.

Sec. 05.25.056.
Certificate of title; inadequate evidence of ownership.

Except as provided under (f) of this section, the owner of an undocumented boat subject to registration in this state under AS

05.25.055

shall apply to the Department of Administration for a certificate of title for the boat.

A person who purchases or obtains a majority ownership of an undocumented boat shall, within 30 days after purchasing or obtaining the boat, apply for a new certificate of title that shows the boat’s change of ownership.

If the Department of Administration is not satisfied as to the ownership of an undocumented boat or believes there may be an undisclosed security interest in an undocumented boat, the Department of Administration may register the boat without issuing a title and shall type or stamp on the face of the certificate of registration “No Title Issued.” A certificate of title may be issued only if the

applicant presents documents sufficient to satisfy the Department of Administration that

the applicant owns the boat; and

there is no undisclosed security interest in the boat; or

title is uncontested for three years following the issuance of the “No Title Issued” registration.

The state and its employees or agents are not liable for damages or costs associated with an act or omission under this section.

The Department of Administration shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

This section does not apply to an undocumented boat that is 24 feet or less in length, unless the owner of the boat chooses to apply to the Department of Administration for a certificate of title for the boat.

History.

(§ 4 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 39,
ch. 111, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 05.25.057.
Alaska Boating Safety Advisory Council established.

The Alaska Boating Safety Advisory Council is established in the department.

The council consists of seven members appointed by the governor. The governor shall appoint each member on the basis of interest in public affairs, knowledge of boating issues as they relate to both safety and water of the state, and good judgment and ability concerning boating safety. The appointed members shall represent boat owner interests, including owners of boats powered by engines and owners of boats that are paddled, poled, rowed, or powered by wind, shall be residents of the state, and shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation or geographical location of residence. The commissioner is not a member of the council, but shall be ex officio secretary.

The purpose of the council is to

recommend to the department boating safety educational materials;

review and make recommendations on proposed boating regulations;

consider regional boating safety needs and promote boating safety education programs throughout the state; and

advise the department on state, regional, and national boating issues.

The council may not meet more than two times in each calendar year. Members of the council receive no compensation for services on the council, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards under AS

39.20.180

.

In this section, “council” means the Alaska Boating Safety Advisory Council.

History.

(§ 12 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under secs. 27 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section is repealed.

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Sec. 05.25.060.
Prohibited operation.

A person may not operate a boat on water of the state

for a recreational purpose or another purpose, or tow water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device, in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life or property of another person; or

that is not equipped as required under this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1976; am § 3 ch 117 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 14 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “(a) A person may not operate a watercraft, whether for recreational purposes or any other purpose, or manipulate water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device on the water of the state in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life or property of another person.

“(b) A person may not operate a watercraft, whether for recreational purposes or any other purpose, in violation of AS

28.35.030

on the water of the state while under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, narcotic drug, barbiturate, or marijuana.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Sec. 05.25.070.
Exemptions.

Boats and persons operating boats are exempt from this chapter when participating in the area set aside for a public regatta, race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition on inland water; for purposes of this section, “inland water” means water of the state that is not offshore water.

History.

(§ 7 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 15 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 16 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “Watercraft and persons operating watercraft are exempt from this chapter, except AS 05.25.060(b), when participating in the area set aside for a public regatta, race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition on inland water.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Sec. 05.25.080.
Enforcement.

The Department of Public Safety has authority for enforcement of this chapter and the regulations adopted under this chapter. Nothing in this chapter authorizes a department or board to enter into an agreement with a department or agency of the federal government that cedes state authority for the management of its waterways to the federal government.

A peace officer, other than a person employed by the federal government, may enforce this chapter and, in the exercise of enforcement, may stop and, if the peace officer has probable cause to believe a violation of this chapter has occurred, board watercraft subject to this chapter. A peace officer may issue a citation as provided in AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

to a person who violates a provision of this chapter.

A person employed by the Department of Natural Resources, or a person, other than a person employed by the federal government, authorized by the commissioner under AS

41.21.955(a)

, acting as a peace officer, may enforce this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter only in units of the state park system.

History.

(§ 9 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 17 ch 28 SLA 2000; am § 7 ch 29 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 2 ch 31 SLA 2012)

Delayed amendment. —

Under §§ 18 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by § 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, § 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, § 8, ch. 29, SLA 2010, § 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and §§ 2 — 4, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in § 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000, and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “Enforcement. A peace officer, other than a person employed by the federal government, may enforce this chapter and, in the exercise of enforcement, may stop and, if the peace officer has probable cause to believe a violation of this chapter has occurred, board watercraft subject to this chapter. A peace officer may issue a citation as provided in AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

to a person who violates a provision of this chapter.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

” for “AS

12.25.180

”; contingently amended the version of this section as repealed and reenacted by sec. 18, ch. 28, SLA 2000, to read, “Enforcement. A peace officer may enforce this chapter and, in the exercise of enforcement, may stop and, if the peace officer has probable cause to believe a violation of this chapter has occurred, board watercraft subject to this chapter. A peace officer may issue a citation as provided in AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

to a person who violates a provision of this chapter.”

The 2012 amendment, effective May 23, 2012, in (a), added the second sentence; in (b), added “, other than a person employed by the federal government,” following “A peace officer”; in (c), added “, other than a person employed by the federal government,” following “Department of Natural Resources, or a person”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 05.25.090.
Penalties.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who violates a provision of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who violates

AS

05.25.010

,

05.25.020

,

05.25.030(b)

,

05.25.060

(2), or a regulation adopted under this chapter relating to AS

05.25.010

or

05.25.020

is guilty of a violation as defined in AS

11.81.900

and may be fined up to $500;

AS

05.25.055

is guilty of a violation as defined in AS

11.81.900

and may be fined up to $50.

The supreme court shall establish by order or rule a schedule of bail amounts for violations under (b) of this section that allow the disposition of a citation without a court appearance.

History.

(§ 10 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 1982; am §§ 3, 4 ch 125 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 20 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, and sec. 5 and 37, ch. 111, SLA 2018, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “(a) Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who violates a provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment of not more than six months, or by both, for each violation unless that person is convicted of a violation of AS

28.35.030

, in which case the sentence shall be in accordance with AS

28.35.030

.

“(b) A person who violates AS

05.25.010(d)

, 05.25.020(d), or

05.25.055

is guilty of a violation, as defined in AS

11.81.900

, and may be fined up to $50.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 05.25.090.
Penalties.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who violates a provision of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person who violates AS

05.25.010(d)

,

05.25.020(b)

, or

05.25.055

is guilty of a violation, as defined in AS

11.81.900

, and may be fined up to $50.

The supreme court shall establish by order or rule a schedule of bail amounts for violations under (b) of this section that allow the disposition of a citation without a court appearance.

History.

(§ 10 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 1982; am §§ 3, 4 ch 125 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 28 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Sec. 05.25.095.
Regulations.

Except as provided in (c) — (e) of this section, the department may adopt regulations regarding requirements for certification of programs on boating safety education.

In consultation with the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Administration may adopt regulations to implement this chapter with respect to the numbering, marking, and titling of undocumented boats.

Regulations adopted under this chapter may not be less stringent than applicable minimum requirements of regulations governing recreational boat safety of the United States Coast Guard.

The department may not adopt a regulation under (a) of this section if, before or during the period for public comment on the proposed regulation provided by AS

44.62.190

, the Alaska Boating Safety Advisory Council provides the department with a written objection regarding the regulation, unless the department modifies the proposed regulation to satisfy the objection. The prohibition of this subsection does not apply if modification of the proposed regulation to satisfy the council’s objection would result in

failure to meet a federal stringency requirement described under (c) of this section; or

a regulation that is not consistent with another provision of law.

Nothing in this section authorizes the department to prohibit a use of or access to the water of the state by a person or user group.

History.

(§ 21 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under secs. 27 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section is repealed.

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Administrative Code. —

For boat registration, see 2 AAC 70.

Sec. 05.25.096.
Fees.

The Department of Administration shall assess the following fees:

motorized boat registration, registration renewal, and transfer of registration, $24 for a three-year period;

nonmotorized boat registration, registration renewal, and transfer of registration, $10 for a three-year period;

replacement of lost registration, $5;

replacement of lost registration validation decals, $5;

barge registration, registration renewal, and transfer of registration, $75 for a three-year period;

boat title and duplicate boat title, $20.

The Department of Administration shall separately account for fees collected under (a) of this section for boat registration and titling that are deposited in the general fund. The annual estimated balance in that account may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the department and the Department of Administration to carry out the purposes of this chapter and AS 30.30.

History.

(§ 21 ch 28 SLA 2000; am § 6 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (a)(5) and (6), in (b), inserted “and titling” following “boat registration” and added “and AS 30.30” at the end.

Sec. 05.25.100.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“aids to navigation” means buoys, beacons, or other fixed objects in the water that are used to mark obstructions to navigation or to direct navigation through safe channels;

“barge” means a boat that is

motorized or nonmotorized;

designed to be towed; and

used for carrying freight;

“boat” means watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water, except for

a ship’s lifeboat;

a seaplane;

an inspected passenger vessel; and

a single air mattress, single inner tube, or other water toy;

“boat dealer” means a person engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling or offering for sale, buying or taking in trade for the purpose of resale, or exchanging, displaying, demonstrating, or offering for sale three or more boats within 12 consecutive months and who receives or expects to receive money, profit, or any other thing of value;

“certificate of number” means the document bearing the identification number issued to a boat by the Department of Administration under this chapter, by a federal agency, or by the state of principal use under a federally approved numbering system;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“department” means the Department of Natural Resources;

“operate” means to navigate or to be in actual physical control of a boat used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water of the state;

“owner” means a person who has a property interest other than a security interest in a boat and the right of use or possession of the boat; “owner” does not include a lessee unless the lease is intended as security;

“ownership” means a property interest other than a security interest;

“passenger” means a person on board a boat who is not the master, operator, crew member, or other person engaged in a capacity in the business of the boat;

“regulatory marker” means an anchored or fixed marker in or on the water, or sign on the shore or on a bridge over the water, other than aids to navigation; “regulatory marker” includes swimming markers, bathing markers, speed zone markers, identification markers, danger zone markers, boat keep-out areas, special anchorage areas, and mooring buoys;

“serviceable condition” as applied to personal flotation devices means

metal or plastic hardware is not broken, deformed, or weakened by corrosion;

webbings or straps are not ripped, torn, or separated from an attachment point;

there are no rotted or deteriorated structural components that fail when tugged;

there are no rips, tears, or open seams in fabric or coatings that are large enough to allow the loss of buoyant material;

buoyant material has not become hardened, nonresilient, permanently compressed, waterlogged, or oil-soaked, and does not show evidence of fungus or mildew;

there is no loss of buoyant material or evidence of buoyant material that is not securely held in position;

there is a properly armed inflation mechanism, complete with a full inflation medium cartridge and all status indicators showing that the inflation mechanism is properly armed, unless the PFD is worn inflated;

inflatable chambers are all capable of holding air;

oral inflation tubes are not blocked, detached, or broken;

the manual inflation lanyard or lever is not inaccessible, broken, or missing;

inflator status indicators are not broken or otherwise non-functional;

“undocumented boat” means a boat that does not possess a valid certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard under 46 U.S.C. 12101 — 12123;

“validation decal” means a decal that has the state of registration and registration expiration year clearly marked;

“water of the state” has the meaning given in the term “navigable water” in AS

38.05.965

; “water of the state” also includes the marginal sea adjacent to the state and the high seas within the territorial limits of the state, irrespective of the ownership of the land underlying those waters.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 1961; am §§ 2, 3 ch 60 SLA 1976; am § 22 ch 28 SLA 2000; am § 7 ch 111 SLA 2018)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 23 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, and sec. 8 and 38, ch. 111, SLA 2018, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, the definitions below will read as follows: “In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“(1) ‘department’ means the Department of Public Safety;

“(2) ‘operate’ means to navigate or otherwise use a watercraft for recreational purposes as opposed to business, subsistence, or commercial purposes;

“(3) ‘watercraft’ means every description of vessel, other than a seaplane on the water, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water and devoted to recreational pursuits unless otherwise expressly provided in this chapter; and excepting vessels having a valid marine document issued by the United States or foreign governments;

“(4) ‘water of the state’ means all water, fresh or salt, inland or coastal, within the territorial limits or under the jurisdiction of the state;

“(5) ‘boat’ means watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water, except for

“(A) a ship's lifeboat;

“(B) a seaplane;

“(C) an inspected passenger vessel; and

“(D) a single air mattress, single inner tube, or other water toy;

“(6) ‘boat dealer’ means a person engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling or offering for sale, buying or taking in trade for the purpose of resale, or exchanging, displaying, demonstrating, or offering for sale three or more boats within 12 consecutive months and who receives or expects to receive money, profit, or any other thing of value;

“(7) ‘certificate of number’ means the document bearing the identification number issued to a boat by the Department of Administration under this chapter, by a federal agency, or by the state of principal use under a federally approved numbering system;

“(8) ‘owner’ means a person who has a property interest other than a security interest in a boat and the right of use or possession of the boat; “owner” does not include a lessee unless the lease is intended as security;

“(9) ‘ownership’ means a property interest other than a security interest;

“(10) ‘undocumented boat’ means a boat that does not possess a valid certificate of documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard under 46 U.S.C. 12101 — 12123;”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (16) [now (2)].